California statutes. Water Code
(a) Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs can help meet the growing demand for clean and abundant water supplies throughout the state.

(b) The participation of the state in the construction of local water conservation projects is desirable to further the effective management of the water resources of
 the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [79151. - 79156.]

79151.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Account” means the Water Conservation Account created by Section 79152.

(b) (1) “Water conservation program or project” means those feasible capital outlay measures undertaken to improve the efficiency of water use through projects, the
 benefits of which exceed the costs.

(2) The programs include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The lining or piping of ditches.

(B) Improvements in water distribution system controls such as automated canal control, construction of small reservoirs within distribution systems that conserve water that has already been captured for use, and related physical improvements.

(C) Tailwater pumpback recovery systems.

(D) Major improvements to, or replacement of, deteriorated distribution systems to reduce leakage and maximize conservation.

(E) Capital outlay features of agricultural water conservation programs
 identified in the “Memorandum of Understanding Regarding Efficient Agricultural Water Management Practices,” dated July 16, 1997, and endorsed by the Agricultural Water Management Council, and any amendments thereto.

(c) “Economically disadvantaged area” means any area of the state for which both of the following statements apply:

(1) A median household income that is less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) based on the most recent federal census.

(2) An annual average unemployment rate that is greater than 9 percent based on the most recent federal census.

(d) (1) “Groundwater recharge facilities” means lands and facilities for artificial groundwater recharge through methods that include, but are not limited to, percolation
 using basins, pits, ditches, and furrows, modified streambeds, flooding, and well injection. For the purposes of this chapter, expenditures for “groundwater recharge facilities” include capital outlay expenditures to expand, renovate, or restructure land and facilities used for the purposes of groundwater recharge and to acquire additional land for recharge basins.

(2) Groundwater recharge facilities may include any of the following:

(A) Instream facilities for regulation of water levels, but not regulation of streamflow to accomplish diversion from the waterway.

(B) Agency-owned facilities for extraction.

(C) Conveyance facilities to convey water to the recharge site, including devices for flow regulation and measurement of recharge waters.

(3) Any part or all of the project facilities, including the land under the facilities, may consist of separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(e) “Infrastructure rehabilitation project” means a project located in an economically disadvantaged area for the repair, replacement, restoration, or rehabilitation of an existing water distribution system that delivers water for domestic, municipal, or industrial uses, including pipelines, pump stations, valves, meters, reservoirs, and all other appurtenant water delivery facilities that result in the reduction or elimination of significant distribution system water losses or replace a failing system component that threatens the health, safety, welfare, and economy of areas relying on the water distribution system.

(f) “Local agency” or “agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved with water management. “Local agency” or “agency” also means a mutual water company. For purposes of this chapter, mutual water company means a nonprofit corporation organized for, or engaged in the business of, developing, distributing, supplying, or delivering water for irrigation or domestic use, or both, to its members or shareholders, at actual cost plus necessary expenses.

(g) “Project” may include any of the following:

(1) Water conservation project.

(2) Groundwater recharge facilities.

(3) Urban water conservation project.

(4) Infrastructure rehabilitation project.

(h) “Urban water conservation project” means capital outlay features of urban water conservation programs identified in the “Memorandum of Understanding Regarding Urban Water Conservation in California,” as amended on April 8, 1998, by the California Urban Water Conservation Council, and any amendments thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79152.

The Water Conservation Account is hereby created in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79153.

(a) The sum of one hundred fifty-five million dollars ($155,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Unallocated funds remaining in the Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Subaccount in the Water Supply Reliability Account in the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund on March 8, 2000, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state
 pursuant to any loan contract executed under Article 3 (commencing with Section 78670) of Chapter 6 of Division 24 shall be deposited in, the account for the purposes of entering into additional loans under Article 3 (commencing with Section 79157) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 79161).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79154.

(a) Any loan agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter may include provisions determined to be necessary by the department.

(b) Any loan agreement pursuant to this chapter shall include all of the following:

(1) A finding by the department that the agency has the ability to repay the loan, that the project is cost-effective, and that the
 project is feasible from an engineering or hydrologic standpoint, or both.

(2) An agreement by the agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project in conformance with approved plans and specifications and to operate and maintain the project properly upon completion throughout the repayment period.

(3) A provision that there shall be no moratorium on, or deferment of, payments of principal or interest.

(4) (A) A loan period of not more than 20 years with an interest rate set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method.

(B) If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of
 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(C) The interest rate for each loan agreement shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79155.

(a) Any grant agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter may include provisions determined to be necessary by the department.

(b) Any grant agreement pursuant to this chapter shall include both of the following:

(1) A determination by the department that the project is economically justified, and that the project is feasible.

(2) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the project, including a feasibility report that sets forth the engineering and financial feasibility of the project, and shall include a description of the proposed facilities and their relation to other water-related facilities in the system service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79155.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, regulations set forth in Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 450.1) of Division 2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations that are in effect on March 8, 2000, may be used to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79156.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used by the department to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Agricultural Water Conservation Program [79157. - 79158.]

79157.

(a) The sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in the account, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be used by the department for loans to local agencies to aid in the acquisition and construction of agricultural water conservation projects, and for grants in accordance with Section 79158.

(b) For the purposes of approving a loan under this section, the department shall
 determine if there will be a net saving of water as a result of each proposed project and if the project is determined by the department to be cost-effective.

(c) A project under this article shall not receive any more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

(d) The department shall give preference to the agencies that propose the most cost-effective projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79158.

(a) The department may make grants to local agencies, under any terms and conditions that may be determined necessary by the department, for the purpose of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for a loan under Section 79157.

(b) No single feasibility study shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 5 percent of the total amount
 deposited in the account may be expended for the purposes of financing feasibility studies.

(c) A grant for a feasibility study shall not affect the maximum amount of any loan that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Groundwater Recharge Facilities Program [79161. - 79161.5.]

79161.

(a) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in the account is hereby appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, for use by the department for loans and grants to local agencies for the acquisition and construction of groundwater recharge facilities.

(b) A loan application pursuant to this article shall include the reasonable cost and benefit of the proposed project, including a
 feasibility report that shall set forth the economic justification for the project, and shall include explanations of the proposed facilities and their relation to other water supply related facilities in the basin or region.

(c) A project under this article shall not receive any more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

(d) The department shall give preference under this section to projects that are located in overdrafted groundwater basins, projects of critical need, projects whose feasibility studies demonstrate the greatest engineering and hydrogeologic feasibility as determined by the department, and projects located in areas that have groundwater management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79161.5.

(a) The department may make grants to local agencies, under any terms and conditions that may be determined necessary by the department, for the purpose of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for a loan under Section 79161.

(b) No single feasibility study shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 5 percent of the total amount
 deposited in the account may be expended for the purposes of financing feasibility studies.

(c) A grant for a feasibility study shall not affect the maximum amount of any loan that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Infrastructure Rehabilitation Program [79162. - 79162.4.]

79162.

(a) The sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) in the account, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be used by the department for grants awarded by the department to local agencies for the purposes of funding infrastructure rehabilitation projects.

(b) (1) For the purposes of making grants pursuant to subdivision (a), the factors to be considered by the
 department in determining whether to enter into an agreement shall include, but not be limited to, the need to implement projects that provide measurable conservation through the reduction of system water losses by rehabilitating water delivery systems.

(2) Grants awarded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available for public water systems owned and operated by local agencies in economically disadvantaged areas with service connections that exceed 200 but are not greater than 16,000 in number. The department shall give highest priority in awarding grants to those agencies with the highest retail water rates and service charges as of January 1, 1999.

(c) No single construction grant under this article shall exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79162.2.

(a) The department may make grants to local agencies, under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the department, for the purpose of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for a grant under Section 79162.

(b) No single feasibility study shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 5 percent of the total amount
 deposited in the account may be expended for the purposes of financing feasibility studies.

(c) A grant for a feasibility study shall not affect the maximum of any construction grant that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79162.4.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Urban Water Conservation Program [79163. - 79164.]

79163.

(a) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in the account, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be used by the department for grants and loans awarded by the department to local agencies for the purposes of funding urban water conservation projects.

(b) A project under this article shall not receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79164.

(a) The department may make grants to local agencies, under any terms and conditions that may be determined necessary by the department, for the purpose of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for a loan under Section 79163.

(b) No single feasibility study shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 5 percent of the total amount
 deposited in the account may be expended for the purposes of financing feasibility studies.

(c) A grant for a feasibility study shall not affect the maximum amount of any loan that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Water Supply, Reliability, and Infrastructure Program [79165. - 79205.16.]



  ARTICLE 1. Water Supply, Reliability, and Infrastructure Account [79165. - 79166.]

79165.

For the purposes of this chapter, “account” means the Water Supply, Reliability, and Infrastructure Account created by Section 79166.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79166.

The Water Supply, Reliability, and Infrastructure Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of six hundred thirty million dollars ($630,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Groundwater Storage Program [79170. - 79183.]

79170.

The Legislature finds and declares that the conjunctive management of surface water and groundwater is an effective way to improve the reliability of water supply for all sectors in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79171.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Conjunctive use” means the temporary storage of water in a groundwater aquifer through intentional recharge and subsequent extraction for later use. Storage is accomplished by either of the following methods:

(1) “Direct recharge” of an aquifer by conducting surface water into the ground by various means,
 including, without limitation, spreading ponds and injection wells for the purpose of making the water stored in the aquifer available for extraction and later use in drier years.

(2) “In-lieu recharge” means increasing the amount of groundwater available in an aquifer by substituting surface water supplies to a user who would otherwise pump groundwater.

(b) “Conjunctive use facilities” include land and appurtenant facilities for any phase of a conjunctive use operation. Appurtenant facilities may include subsurface storage, treatment, conveyance, recharge ponds, injection wells, spreading grounds, monitoring, measurements, subsidence detection, flow regulation, detention basins to facilitate recharge, diversion facilities, and extraction facilities.

(c) “Conjunctive use project” means a project that is intended to
 produce water supply benefits for the local agency or a project that is intended to produce water supply benefits for water users, including the environment, in addition to the local agency.

(d) “Local agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, joint powers authority, mutual water company, or other political subdivision of the state.

(e) “Project participants” means any public agency participating in, and benefiting from, a conjunctive use project under this article.

(f) “Subaccount” means the Conjunctive Use Subaccount created by Section 79172.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79172.

There is hereby created in the account the Conjunctive Use Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79173.

The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79174.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department for grants for feasibility studies, project design, or the construction of conjunctive use projects on a pilot or operational scale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79175.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be expended for purposes of financing feasibility studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79176.

For the purpose of approving projects pursuant to this article, the department shall give priority to those projects for which there is available third-party funds from any source other than the Central Valley Project Restoration Fund authorized by the Central Valley Project Improvement Act. The department shall also take into consideration all of the following with regard to each proposed project:

(a) The magnitude of the actual
 increase in water supply yield and reliability compared to preexisting conditions.

(b) The consistency with the plans or recommendations proposed by CALFED.

(c) The distribution of the benefits to water supply and to the environment.

(d) The availability of the storage for conserved water.

(e) The technical and environmental suitability of the groundwater basin for conjunctive use.

(f) The potential to reduce critically overdrafted conditions in a groundwater basin.

(g) The need for the project.

(h) The potential to alleviate salt water intrusion into
 groundwater basins or other groundwater quality degradation.

(i) The economic, engineering, and hydrogeologic justification for the project.

(j) The availability of third-party or local matching funds from any source other than the Central Valley Project Restoration Fund authorized by the Central Valley Project Improvement Act.

(k) The involvement of one or more local agencies whose jurisdiction or water service area overlies or is adjacent to the aquifer utilized to store water.

(l) The potential to reduce dry year demand for surface water under existing contracts.

(m) The existence of a system for the recovery of the stored water or an agreement with the department or a local
 agency for the installation of that system.

(n) Whether the project is located in an area that is subject to a groundwater management program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79177.

To be eligible for funding for the construction of a conjunctive use project under this article, an applicant that is other than a local agency shall be required to carry out that project with the participation of a local agency. The department or a local agency may provide technical assistance, coordination, or any other assistance in implementing a project or study if requested by the participating local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79178.

No construction project may receive more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) from the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79179.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79180.

Not less than 40 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount shall be expended for studies, projects, and facilities within watersheds of the central valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79181.

(a) A project undertaken pursuant to this article shall fully protect and preserve the groundwater rights of the overlying landowners and shall fully protect and preserve the water rights of the project participants. The department shall not provide funding for a project unless it determines that the project will be designed and operated in a manner that ensures that other users of the same or a hydrologically related aquifer will not suffer any unreasonable diminution of the
 quantity or quality of their groundwater supplies or incur additional uncompensated expense as a result of the implementation of the project.

(b) For the purposes of receiving funding for a conjunctive use project pursuant to this article, the applicant shall be required to do both of the following:

(1) Provide for a continuing groundwater monitoring and mitigation program.

(2) Limit the extraction of the groundwater to not more than the amount of water that is stored or recharged by the project participants or the amount that complies with all laws and contract terms governing the extraction, appropriation, and use of groundwater by the project participants.

(c) Persons and agencies participating in the project may not assert a claim or file a cause of
 action against an overlying landowner who is not exceeding either of the following:

(1) The overlying landowner’s historic rate of groundwater pumping.

(2) The full amount of groundwater to which the overlying landowner would be entitled to under state law regarding rights to groundwater and reasonable beneficial use on the landowner’s land that overlies the groundwater.

(d) The overlying landowners may not assert a claim or file a cause of action against the persons or agencies participating in the project if the project is implemented in compliance with this section, except as provided by contract between the project participants.

(e) Nothing in this article modifies state law with regard to groundwater rights, regulation, or
 management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79182.

In carrying out this article and awarding grants, the department shall convene and consult with an advisory committee comprised of technically qualified representatives of local water agencies, project participants, environmental interests, agricultural laborer interests, and interests representing farmers who use groundwater. The advisory committee shall be geographically balanced to reflect the communities that use water in the Central Valley. If a member of the advisory committee, or a member of
 his or her immediate family, is employed by a grant applicant or the employer of a grant applicant, the committee members shall make that disclosure to the other members of the committee and shall not participate in the review of the grant application of that applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79183.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bay-Delta Multipurpose Water Management Program [79190. - 79203.]

79190.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “CALFED Bay-Delta Program” or “program” means the undertaking by CALFED pursuant to the Framework Agreement dated June 20, 1994, to develop a long-term solution to water management, environmental, and other problems in the bay-delta watershed by means of a programmatic environmental impact statement/environmental impact
 report.

(b) “CALFED EIS/EIR” means the final programmatic environmental impact statement/environmental impact report prepared by CALFED.

(c) “CALFED stage 1 action” means an action identified in the preferred alternative of the CALFED EIS/EIR as an action intended for implementation during stage 1 of Phase III of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(d) (1) “Eligible project” means a demonstration project, subject to the CALFED adaptive management principle that requires an assessment of the performance of the demonstration projects in order to determine which projects are successful in achieving the goals of the program.

(2) “Eligible project” means a project that meets both of the following requirements.

(A) The project is identified in the CALFED EIS/EIR as a CALFED stage 1 action.

(B) The project does one or more of the following:

(i) Constructs treatment facilities or relocates discharge facilities for agricultural drainage generated within the delta to improve water quality in the delta or the quality of water that is transported from the delta.

(ii) Constructs facilities to control waste discharges that contribute to low dissolved oxygen and other water quality problems in the lower San Joaquin River and the south delta.

(iii) Constructs fish facilities for the State Water Project or the Central Valley Project intakes in the south delta, such as facilities for fish screens, fish
 handling, and fish passage, or modifications to intake structures or other facilities, to reduce losses of any life stages of fish to water diversions in the San Joaquin River and the delta in accordance with paragraph (1) of Section (C) of Chapter IV of the board’s 1995 water quality control plan.

(iv) Constructs a permanent barrier at the head of Old River to improve fish migration and other permanent barriers in the south delta channels to improve water quality and water level for local diversions.

(v) Constructs facilities to control drainage from abandoned mines that adversely affect water quality in the bay-delta.

(vi) Constructs a permanent barrier at Grantline Canal to improve water quality and water levels for local diversion.

(e) “Subaccount”
 means the Bay-Delta Multipurpose Water Management Subaccount created by Section 79194.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79191.

This article does not affect the authority of any agency pursuant to any other provision of law to expend funds for the purposes described in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79192.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) CALFED is in the process of preparing a programmatic EIS/EIR for a long-term comprehensive plan that will resolve problems related to ecosystem restoration, including the recovery of endangered species such as chinook salmon, water quality, water supply, water management, and system integrity for the protection of beneficial uses of the bay-delta ecosystem.

(b) The CALFED Bay-Delta Program is of statewide and national importance. The state should participate in the funding of eligible projects as a part of its ongoing program to improve conditions in the bay-delta ecosystem.

(c) The programmatic EIS/EIR will include a schedule for funding and implementing all elements of the long-term comprehensive plan.

(d) The elements of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program will achieve balanced solutions in all identified problem areas, including the ecosystem, water quality, water supply, and system integrity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79193.

(a) This article does not authorize the implementation of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program or any element of that program. The implementation of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program, or any element of that program, shall only be undertaken pursuant to authority provided by law other than this division.

(b) Nothing in this article affects the obligation to comply with provisions of existing law in connection with the
 implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79194.

There is hereby created in the account the Bay-Delta Multipurpose Water Management Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79195.

The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79196.

(a) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department to carry out eligible projects and for the purposes of Section 79202.

(b) Money in the subaccount that is allocated to carry out eligible projects, as described in clauses (ii), (iv), and (vi) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190, and is not expended for those
 purposes, may be reallocated by the department to carry out other eligible projects, as described in clauses (i), (iii), and (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(c) No funds in the subaccount shall be used by the department unless and until the department has consulted, on an annual basis, with the state and federal agencies that participate in CALFED, as well as representatives of the public convened as a duly authorized advisory committee, with regard to the specific projects proposed for funding under this article. Decisions regarding specific expenditures of funds provided under this article shall be jointly determined, to the maximum extent possible, by the recommendations of the state and federal CALFED agencies with the advice of the advisory committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79196.5.

The funds appropriated pursuant to Section 79196 shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(b) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of
 Section 79190.

(c) One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(d) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(e) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(f) Sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) for the purposes of the project described in clause (vi) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 79190.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79197.

No funds in the subaccount may be expended until all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The CALFED EIS/EIR has been certified by the state lead agency and a notice of determination has been issued as required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) The CALFED EIS/EIR has been filed by the federal lead agencies with the
 United States Environmental Protection Agency, the required notice has been published in the Federal Register, and there has been federal approval of a program identical to the program approved by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79198.

The state, to the greatest extent possible, shall secure federal and nonfederal funds to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79199.

Due to the importance of issuing permits and otherwise expediting all elements of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program in a timely and balanced manner, the following procedures shall apply to the use of funds authorized by this article:

(a) After the requirements set forth in Section 79197 are met, funds in the subaccount shall become available for use in accordance with the schedule for eligible projects set forth in the final programmatic
 EIS/EIR, unless the Secretary of the Resources Agency determines that the schedule established in the final programmatic EIS/EIR has not been substantially adhered to.

(b) On or before November 15 of each year, the Secretary of the Resources Agency, in consultation with state and federal CALFED representatives and other interested persons and agencies, shall review adherence to the schedule.

(c) The absence of funding from nonfederal or nonstate sources shall not be a basis for a determination that the schedule has not been adhered to.

(d) If, at the conclusion of each annual review, the Secretary of the Resources Agency determines that the schedule established in the final programmatic EIS/EIR, or a revised schedule prepared pursuant to this subdivision, has not been substantially adhered to, the secretary, after